Utah statutes.
63G-7-901.   Expenses of attorney general, general counsel for state judiciary, and general counsel for the Legislature in representing the state, its branches, members, or employees.

(1) (a)  The Office of the Attorney General has primary responsibility to provide legal representation to the judicial, executive, and legislative branches of state government in cases where coverage under the Risk Management Fund created by Section 63A-4-201 applies.

(b)  When the attorney general has primary responsibility to provide legal representation to the judicial or legislative branches, the attorney general shall consult with the general counsel for the state judiciary and with the general counsel for the Legislature, to solicit their assistance in defending their respective branch, and in determining strategy and making decisions concerning the disposition of those claims.

(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(b), the decision for settlement of monetary claims in those cases lies with the attorney general and the state risk manager.

(2) (a)  If the Judicial Council, after consultation with the general counsel for the state judiciary, determines that the Office of the Attorney General cannot adequately defend the state judiciary, its members, or employees because of a conflict of interest, separation of powers concerns, or other political or legal differences, the Judicial Council may direct its general counsel to separately represent and defend it.

(b)  If the general counsel for the state judiciary undertakes independent legal representation of the state judiciary, its members, or employees, the general counsel shall notify the state risk manager and the attorney general in writing before undertaking that representation.

(c)  If the state judiciary elects to be represented by its own counsel under this section, the decision for settlement of claims against the state judiciary, its members, or employees, where Risk Management Fund coverage applies, lies with the general counsel for the state judiciary and the state risk manager.

(3) (a)  If the Legislative Management Committee, after consultation with the general counsel for the Legislature, determines that the Office of the Attorney General cannot adequately defend the legislative branch, its members, or employees because of a conflict of interest, separation of powers concerns, or other political or legal differences, the Legislative Management Committee may direct its general counsel to separately represent and defend it.

(b)  If the general counsel for the Legislature undertakes independent legal representation of the Legislature, its members, or employees, the general counsel shall notify the state risk manager and the attorney general in writing before undertaking that representation.

(c)  If the legislative branch elects to be represented by its own counsel under this section, the decision for settlement of claims against the legislative branch, its members, or employees, where Risk Management Fund coverage applies, lies with the general counsel for the Legislature and the state risk manager.

(4) (a)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 67-5-3 or any other provision of the Utah Code, the attorney general, the general counsel for the state judiciary, and the general counsel for the Legislature may bill the Department of Administrative Services for all costs and legal fees expended by their respective offices, including attorneys' and secretarial salaries, in representing the state or any indemnified employee against any claim for which the Risk Management Fund may be liable and in advising state agencies and employees regarding any of those claims.

(b)  The risk manager shall draw funds from the Risk Management Fund for this purpose.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

